Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 2. Inquests

There is no statutory requirement for inquest as condition precedent to prosecution.

Raigosa v. State, 562 P.2d 1009,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1977).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Homicide: cremation of victim's body as violation of accused's rights, 70 ALR4th 1091.

§ 7-4-201.
Reports of death; investigation; summoning of jurors; fees and costs; inspection of medical records.

When any person is found dead and the death appears to have occurred under circumstances indicating the death is a coroner’s case, the person who discovers the death shall report it immediately to law enforcement authorities who shall in turn notify the coroner. A person who knowingly violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

When the coroner is notified that the dead body of any person has been found within the limits of the county or that the death resulted from injury sustained within the county and he suspects that the death is a coroner’s case, he shall conduct an investigation which may include:

An examination of the body and an investigation into the medical history of the case;

The appointment of a qualified physician to assist in determining the cause of death;

An autopsy if the physician appointed to assist the coroner under this subsection determines an autopsy is necessary;

An inquest; or

Any other reasonable procedure which may be necessary to determine the cause of death.

If the coroner determines to hold an inquest he shall summon three (3) citizens of the county to appear before him to act as jurors at the time and place named. The jurors shall receive the same fee paid jurors in district court as provided in W.S.

1-11-303

and per diem and travel expenses in the same manner as state employees. The coroner may furnish transportation for the jury and witnesses to and from the place of inquest and for the removal of the dead body.

If a coroner determines the injuries which caused the person’s death were received in a county other than that in which the body was found, he shall transfer authority for the investigation and inquest to the coroner for that county.

The expense and costs of conducting the investigation or holding the inquest shall be paid by the county in which the injuries were received. The accounts of the claimants shall be attested by the coroner or acting coroner, and shall be presented in duplicate to the board of county commissioners of the proper county. If the board of county commissioners finds that the inquest was necessary and in accordance with law, and the accounts are correct and just, the accounts shall be paid in warrants properly drawn upon the order of the county commissioners.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the coroner may inspect medical and psychological data relating to the person whose death is being investigated if the coroner determines the information is relevant and necessary to the investigation.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, Art. VI, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 1879; Laws 1888, ch. 80, § 1; 1890, ch. 43, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 1173; Laws 1905, ch. 86, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1279; C.S. 1920, § 1531; R.S. 1931, § 30-704; C.S. 1945, § 27-904; W.S. 1957, § 7-81; Laws 1961, ch. 160, § 1; 1975, ch. 141, § 1; 1979, ch. 125, § 1; 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1990, ch. 70, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to limited disclosure of client treatment records, see §

9-2-125

.

As to receipt of meal, lodging and travel expenses by state employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to holding coroner's inquest with respect to fatal mine accidents generally, see §

30-2-212

.

As to when coroner's permission required to embalm dead human bodies, see §

33-16-108

.

Subject matter jurisdiction.—

District court properly dismissed for lack of jurisdiction a motion filed by a homeowner and a decedent’s father to set aside the coroner’s inquest verdict because a coroner’s inquest was an executive matter conducted outside of the courts and was not a final order and had no probative effect. Cassidy v. Teton Cty. Coroner (In re Birkholz), 2019 WY 19, 434 P.3d 1102,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2019).

Filing of records with the district court does not, without more, confer jurisdiction on the district court since a coroner’s inquest verdict is not a final order or judgment, and the court’s equitable powers to grant relief do not come into play; questions raised about the propriety of the process, the lack of fundamental safeguards in an inquisition, and bias in the proceeding can best be addressed by the legislature. Cassidy v. Teton Cty. Coroner (In re Birkholz), 2019 WY 19, 434 P.3d 1102,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2019).

Subject matter jurisdiction.

Coroner’s inquest is an executive matter conducted outside of the courts, and the coroner’s inquest verdict is not a final order and has no probative effect; the filing of the coroner’s inquest verdict and other associated documents with the district court is ministerial and does not confer jurisdiction on the district court. Cassidy v. Teton Cty. Coroner (In re Birkholz), 2019 WY 19, 434 P.3d 1102,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2019).

Discretion of board. —

The board of county commissioners is given discretionary authority to approve the claim for expenses and costs submitted by the coroner. Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993).

Coroner's inquest unnecessary to acquire jurisdiction where evidence overwhelming and defendant pleads guilty. —

The failure to hold a coroner's inquest did not prevent the district court from acquiring jurisdiction in a criminal case. In light of the record which established five bullet wounds in the victim's body and the defendant's plea of guilty, the coroner's inquest would have been an exercise in futility. The defendant admitted by his plea all the essential elements of the offense, including the fact that he had killed the victim unlawfully. Holmes v. State, 715 P.2d 196,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 506

(Wyo. 1986), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Authority to draw blood samples. —

The coroner was completely within statutory duties and authority in withdrawing blood samples from the decedent's body; permission was not required of anyone for the coroner to conduct the taking of such samples. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 911 P.2d 1054,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 7-4-202.
Impaneling of bystanders as jurors; oath.

If any juror fails to appear, the coroner shall immediately summon the proper number from the bystanders and proceed to impanel them. He shall administer the following oath: “You do solemnly swear (or affirm) that you will diligently inquire and truly present if known or determinable, the time and date of death, and by what means and manner the death of (NAME OF DECEASED) was caused, according to your knowledge and the evidence given you, so help you God.”

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, Art. VI, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1880; R.S. 1899, § 1174; C.S. 1910, § 1280; C.S. 1920, § 1532; R.S. 1931, § 30-705; C.S. 1945, § 27-905; W.S. 1957, § 7-84; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 152, § 1; ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to oaths generally, see chapter 2 of title 1.

§ 7-4-203.
Issuance of subpoenas; witness fees; enforcement of attendance.

The coroner may issue subpoenas and compel the attendance of witnesses to testify at the inquest. Witnesses shall be allowed the same fees as in cases before a circuit court, and the coroner shall have the same authority to enforce the attendance of witnesses and to punish for contempt as provided by W.S.

1-21-901

through

1-21-909

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, Art. VI, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 1881; R.S. 1899, § 1175; C.S. 1910, § 1281; C.S. 1920, § 1533; R.S. 1931, § 30-706; C.S. 1945, § 27-906; W.S. 1957, § 7-83; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to amount of witness fees, see §

1-14-102

.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “justice of the peace or” following “in cases before a.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 7-4-204.
Oath of witness; recording of testimony; compensation of reporter.

An oath shall be administered to each witness as follows: “You do solemnly swear (or affirm) that the testimony which you shall give to this inquest concerning the death of the person about whom this inquest is being held, shall be the truth, the whole truth and nothing but the truth, so help you God.” The coroner shall insure that all testimony in an inquest shall be recorded. The compensation of the court reporter or of the person transcribing the audio tape shall be as prescribed by the board of county commissioners. Unless specifically requested by the coroner or prosecuting attorney, audio tapes need not be transcribed.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, Art. VI, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 1882; R.S. 1899, § 1176; Laws 1905, ch. 15, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1282; C.S. 1920, § 1534; R.S. 1931, § 30-707; C.S. 1945, § 27-907; Laws 1953, ch. 80, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 7-84; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to oaths generally, see chapter 2 of title 1.

§ 7-4-205.
Return of inquisition by jury.

After hearing testimony and making necessary inquiries, the jurors shall return to the coroner their signed inquisition stating the name of the person and when, how and by what means, if known, he came to his death.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, Art. VI, § 8; R.S. 1887, § 1883; R.S. 1899, § 1177; C.S. 1910, § 1283; C.S. 1920, § 1535; R.S. 1931, § 30-708; C.S. 1945, § 27-908; W.S. 1957, § 7-85; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-4-206.
Coroner's return to court.

The coroner shall return to the district court the inquisition, the written evidence and a list of witnesses providing material testimony.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, Art. VI, § 10; R.S. 1887, § 1885; R.S. 1899, § 1179; C.S. 1910, § 1285; C.S. 1920, § 1537; R.S. 1931, § 30-710; C.S. 1945, § 27-910; W.S. 1957, § 7-87; W.S. 1977, §

7-4-207

; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Subject matter jurisdiction.—

Construction.—

Subject matter jurisdiction.—

District court properly dismissed for lack of jurisdiction a motion filed by a homeowner and a decedent’s father to set aside the coroner’s inquest verdict because a coroner’s inquest was an executive matter conducted outside of the courts and was not a final order and had no probative effect. Cassidy v. Teton Cty. Coroner (In re Birkholz), 2019 WY 19, 434 P.3d 1102,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2019).

Filing of records with the district court does not, without more, confer jurisdiction on the district court since a coroner’s inquest verdict is not a final order or judgment, and the court’s equitable powers to grant relief do not come into play; questions raised about the propriety of the process, the lack of fundamental safeguards in an inquisition, and bias in the proceeding can best be addressed by the legislature. Cassidy v. Teton Cty. Coroner (In re Birkholz), 2019 WY 19, 434 P.3d 1102,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2019).

Coroner’s inquest is an executive matter conducted outside of the courts, and the coroner’s inquest verdict is not a final order and has no probative effect; the filing of the coroner’s inquest verdict and other associated documents with the district court is ministerial and does not confer jurisdiction on the district court. Cassidy v. Teton Cty. Coroner (In re Birkholz), 2019 WY 19, 434 P.3d 1102,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2019).

Construction.—

Phrases “the inquisition,” the “written evidence,” and “a list of witnesses” are construed in reference to each other, and while the word inquisition could refer to the official inquiry conducted by the jury, there is no doubt given “its company” that it refers to the record of the findings of the jury; the meaning of the word “inquisition” is evident, and the statute directs that a record of the proceedings be filed with the district court. Cassidy v. Teton Cty. Coroner (In re Birkholz), 2019 WY 19, 434 P.3d 1102,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 7-4-207.
Disposition of body and effects of deceased.

When the coroner investigates the death of a person whose body is not claimed by a friend or relative within five (5) days of the date of discovery and whose death does not require further investigation, he shall cause the body to be decently buried. The expense of the burial shall be paid from any property found with the body. If no property is found, the expense of the burial shall be paid by the county in which the investigation occurs.

The coroner shall within a reasonable time after completing the investigation, turn over to the appointed personal representative of the estate of the deceased or, if none, to the clerk of the district court of the county, all money or other property found upon the body of the deceased. Personal items valued at less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and items necessary for the convenience of the deceased’s next of kin may be released to the deceased’s next of kin.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, Art. VI, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 1886; R.S. 1899, § 1180; C.S. 1910, § 1286; C.S. 1920, § 1538; R.S. 1931, § 30-711; C.S. 1945, § 27-911; W.S. 1957, § 7-88; W.S. 1977, §

7-4-208

; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to when coroner's permission required to embalm dead human bodies, see §

33-16-108

.

§ 7-4-208.
Authority of sheriff to perform duties of coroner.

If there is no coroner, deputy coroner or in case of their absence, or inability to act, the county sheriff of the same county, the state health officer pursuant to W.S.

35-1-241

, or the coroner of another county if there is a joint powers agreement pursuant to W.S.

16-1-102

through

16-1-108

between the counties authorizing the coroner to so act, is authorized to perform the duties of coroner in relation to dead bodies.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, Art. VI, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 1887; R.S. 1899, § 1181; C.S. 1910, § 1287; C.S. 1920, § 1539; R.S. 1931, § 30-712; C.S. 1945, § 27-912; W.S. 1957, § 7-89; W.S. 1977, §

7-4-209

; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2003, ch. 83, § 2; 2006, ch. 53, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to county sheriffs, see §

18-3-601

et seq.

As to safe disposal of corpses in emergency circumstances, see §

35-1-241

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “or the coroner of another county if there is a joint powers agreement pursuant to W.S.

16-1-102

through

16-1-108

between the counties authorizing the coroner to so act” and made related changes.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 53, § 2 appropriates ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) from the general fund to the office of the attorney general for payments to the board of coroners as authorized under W.S. 7-4-211(b).

§ 7-4-209.
Postmortem examination; liability limitation.

When an inquisition is being held, if the coroner or the jury shall deem it requisite, he may summon one (1) or more physicians or surgeons, to make an autopsy or postmortem examination.

If it is necessary to obtain or preserve evidence of the cause of death, the district attorney may order that a qualified physician perform an autopsy or postmortem examination of the body of any person who appears to have died by unlawful means, by violence, or when the cause of death is unknown.

No person is subject to civil liability solely because he requested or was involved in the performing of an autopsy that was ordered by a coroner or district attorney.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, Art. VI, § 13; R.S. 1887, § 1888; R.S. 1899, § 1882; C.S. 1910, § 1288; C.S. 1920, § 1540; R.S. 1931, § 30-713; C.S. 1945, § 27-913; W.S. 1957, § 7-90; W.S. 1977, §

7-4-210

; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 152, § 1; ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to fee of physician or surgeon testifying as an expert or making postmortem examination, see §§

1-14-104

and

1-14-105

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for wrongful autopsy, 18 ALR4th 858.

Civil liability in conjunction with autopsy, 97 ALR5th 419.

§ 7-4-210.
Fees and mileage; salary.

The coroner or deputy coroner of each county within this state shall receive fees and mileage, if any, as set by the board of county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners shall set the salary of the coroner and deputy coroner. A coroner or deputy coroner shall not be prohibited from receiving other fees for their services unrelated to their official duties as coroner or deputy coroner.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 60, § 1; 1897, ch. 22, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1183; C.S. 1910, § 1289; C.S. 1920, § 1541; R.S. 1931, § 30-714; C.S. 1945, § 27-914; W.S. 1957, § 7-91; Laws 1975, ch. 141, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

7-4-211

; Laws 1979, ch. 105, § 1; 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2005, ch. 220, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to deputy coroners receiving same compensation as provided in this section, see §

7-4-102

.

The 2005 amendment

added (b), designating the existing provisions as (a).

Laws 2005, ch. 220, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March, 2005.

Prospective application. —

Laws 2005, ch. 220, § 2, provides: “This act shall not be construed to authorize an increase in the salary of any coroner during the term of office being currently served for which he was elected as prohibited by Wyoming Constitution, Article 3, Section 32.”

Discretion of board. —

The board of county commissioners is given discretionary authority to approve the claim for expenses and costs submitted by the coroner. Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993).

Acts within scope of duties. —

Approving budgets and determining compensation for the county coroner's office are statutory functions expressly within the scope of duties required of a member of a board of county commissioners. Therefore allegations of insufficient budget allocations and determination of inadequate compensation levels could not form the basis of a claim for tortious conduct against members of a board of county commissioners. Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 7-4-211.
Board of coroner standards.

There is created a board of coroner standards. The board shall consist of one (1) chairman and six (6) members appointed by and who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor as follows:

One (1) shall be a physician with a specialty in pathology who is licensed to practice in this state;

Three (3) shall be duly elected coroners in this state;

One (1) shall be a funeral director in this state;

One (1) shall be a duly elected district attorney in this state;

One (1) shall be a peace officer certified under W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-711

.

The members of the board shall be appointed to terms of four (4) years which are concurrent with the terms of the office of coroner. Board members not otherwise compensated for attending board meetings shall receive travel expenses and per diem in the same manner and amount as state employees, and any other reasonable expenses upon board approval. Board members not otherwise compensated shall have their expenses paid from the general fund by appropriation to the office of the attorney general.

The board shall:

Meet at least biannually and at the call of the chairman or of a majority of the membership;

Promulgate standards dealing with the investigation of coroner’s cases;

Promulgate educational and training requirements for coroner basic and continuing education requirements and review those requirements annually;

Cooperate with the peace officer standards and training commission in developing basic and continuing education courses for coroners;

Promulgate employment standards for deputy coroners and coroner employees. The standards may include the requirement that deputy coroners and coroner employees provide to the employing coroner fingerprints and other information necessary for a state and national criminal history record background check and release of information as provided in W.S. 7-19-106(k)(ii) and federal P.L. 92-544 and consent to the release of any criminal history information to the employing coroner;

Promulgate rules and regulations to provide for the review of complaints if a coroner or deputy coroner has failed to comply with any provision of W.S.

7-4-103

or this subsection or has failed to meet any educational or training requirement provided under this section. The board shall make recommendations to the peace officer standards and training commission regarding revocation of certifications based on these investigations;

Provide for a system to offer educational programs to assist coroners and deputy coroners in meeting educational and training requirements provided under this section.

The peace officer standards and training commission shall cooperate with the board of coroner standards in establishing course requirements and continuing education requirements required by law.

The board shall contact the district attorney for the county or the attorney general to initiate an action and may serve as complaining party in an action under W.S.

7-4-103

(b) or

18-3-902

to remove any coroner who is not in compliance with W.S.

7-4-103

.

In addition to any action under subsection (e) of this section, the board shall notify the county commissioners for the county of any coroner or deputy coroner who has had his certification revoked.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 5; Laws 1986, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-4-212; Laws 1987, ch. 152, § 1; ch. 157, § 3; 1990, ch. 70, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, § 1; 2006, ch. 53, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; 2014 ch. 57, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to peace officer standards and training commission, see §

9-1-701

et seq.

As to receipt of meal, lodging and travel expenses by state employees, see §

9-3-102

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (b), substituted “not otherwise compensated for attending board meetings” for “who are not elected county officers or employees of a government agency,” inserted “and any other reasonable expenses upon board approval,” added the last sentence; in (c)(i), inserted “at least biannually and”; inserted “and review those requirements annually” in (c)(iii); in (e), inserted “the attorney general,” inserted “7-4-103(b) or”; and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(v), substituted “9-1-711” for “9-1-707.”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (c)(vi), (c)(vii) and (f).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1986, ch. 49, § 1, amended and numbered Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 5, which had appeared as a temporary provision under §

9-1-634

, as former § 7-4-212, which was renumbered as §

7-4-211

as a result of the 1987 revision of this title.

Federal law. —

P.L. 92-544, 86 Stat. 119, is codified in various provisions in titles 22, 28, 42, 48, and 50 Appx. of the U.S. Code.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 53, § 2 provides ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) from the general fund to the office of the attorney general for payments to the board of coroners as authorized under W.S. 7-4-211(b).

Authority of the Board of Coroner Standards.—

Board of Coroner Standards did not have the authority to review complaints alleging that a coroner committed misconduct while conducting an inquest, and therefore the Board’s refusal to investigate the coroner’s alleged misconduct was affirmed, because this section authorized Board investigation for failure to comply with that subsection and made no reference to authority to investigate for alleged failure to comply with Board standards. The remainder of this section bolstered the court’s conclusion that the Board only had authority to review complaints related to coroner education and training. Hayse v. Wyo. Bd. of Coroner Stds., 2020 WY 4, 455 P.3d 267,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2020).